Tennessee, session 114, SB1833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 29, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) In any proceeding on a claim against a higher education institution for
negligence in admitting, enrolling, extending housing opportunities to, or otherwise
facilitating the educational attainment of a person who has been previously convicted of
a criminal offense, a higher education institution is not liable based solely upon the fact
that the person has been previously convicted of a criminal offense.
(b) In a cause of action against a higher education institution for negligence in
admitting, enrolling, extending housing opportunities to, or otherwise facilitating the
educational attainment of a person who has been previously convicted of a criminal
offense, evidence that the person has been previously convicted of a criminal offense is
not admissible.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply when:
(1) The higher education institution had actual knowledge of the person's
prior conviction for a violent offense, as defined in § 40-35-120(b), or a violent
sexual offense, as defined in § 40-39-202; or
(2) The higher education institution, having actual knowledge of the
person's commission of a violent offense, as defined in § 40-35-120(b), or a
violent sexual offense, as defined in § 40-39-202, after admittance, was willful in
SB1833
010897
- 1 -

allowing the person to continue enrolling in, residing at, or otherwise utilizing the
higher education institution.
(d) This section does not create a cause of action or expand an existing cause of
action.
(e) Section 1-3-119 relative to implied rights of action applies to this section.
(f) As used in this section, "higher education institution" includes, but is not
limited to, a school, college, university, or other type of entity offering educational
credentials, instruction, or educational services primarily to persons who have completed
or terminated the person's secondary education or who are beyond the age of
compulsory high school attendance for the attainment of educational, professional, or
vocational objectives.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to claims arising on or after that date.
- 2 - 010897